Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32.5 COLORADO LAND RECLAMATION ACT FOR THE EXTRACTION OF CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS
34-32.5-118. Forfeiture of financial warranties.

A financial warranty shall be subject to forfeiture whenever the board determines that one or more of the following circumstances exist:

The operator has violated a cease-and-desist order entered pursuant to section 34-32.5-124 and, if corrective action was proposed in such order, has failed to complete such corrective action although ample time to do so has elapsed; or

The operator is in default under a performance warranty and has failed to cure such default although the operator has been given written notice and has had ample time to do so; or

The financial warrantor has failed to maintain a financial warranty in good standing as required by section 34-32.5-117; or

The financial warrantor no longer has the financial ability to carry out any obligations required under this article.

When the board has reason to believe a financial warranty is subject to forfeiture, it shall so notify the operator and all financial warrantors. The board shall grant the operator and all financial warrantors the right to appear before the board at a hearing to be held not less than thirty days after the parties' receipt of such notice. Any such hearing shall be held in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

At a hearing held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the board may withdraw or modify any determination that the financial warranty is subject to forfeiture, settle or compromise the determination, or confirm its determination that the financial warranty should be forfeited.

Upon finding that a financial warranty should be forfeited, the board shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law to support its decision and shall issue an order directing affected financial warrantors to immediately deliver to the board all amounts warranted by applicable financial warranties.

The board, upon issuing an order pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, may request the attorney general to institute proceedings to secure or recover amounts warranted by forfeited financial warranties. The attorney general shall have the power, inter alia, to:

Foreclose upon any real and personal property encumbered for the benefit of the state;

Collect, present for payment, take possession of, and otherwise reduce to cash any property held as security by the board;

Dispose of pledged property.

The amount of a forfeited financial warranty shall constitute a lien upon project-related fixtures or equipment offered as proof of financial responsibility pursuant to section 34-32.5-117. Such lien shall be in favor of this state.

The lien described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4) shall have priority over all other liens and encumbrances, irrespective of the date of recordation, except liens of record on June 19, 1981, and liens of the United States, this state, and political subdivisions of this state for unpaid taxes and shall attach and be deemed perfected as of the date the board approves issuance of the operator's permit.

Funds recovered by the attorney general in proceedings brought pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall be held in the special account described in section 34-32.5-122 and shall be used to reclaim lands covered by forfeited warranties; except that five percent of the amount of such forfeited warranties shall be deposited in the mined land reclamation fund, created in section 34-32-127, to cover administrative costs incurred by the office in performing reclamation. The board shall have a right of entry to reclaim such lands, and upon completion of such reclamation the board shall present a full accounting to the financial warrantor and shall refund all unspent moneys.

Notwithstanding any discharge of applicable financial warranties, an operator in default shall remain liable for the actual cost of reclaiming affected lands less any amounts expended by the board pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a corporate surety may elect to reclaim affected lands in accordance with an approved plan in lieu of forfeiting a bond penalty.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1183, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-119. Operators - succession.

When one operator succeeds another at an uncompleted operation, the board shall release the first operator from all liability as to that operation and shall release all applicable performance and financial warranties as to such operation if the successor operator assumes all liability for the reclamation of the affected land and such obligation is covered by appropriate performance and financial warranties. The fee specified in section 34-32.5-125 (1)(a)(X) shall be paid to the board by the successor operator before the first operator is released from liability and before any financial warranties are released.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 180, § 7, effective April 18.

34-32.5-120. Permit refused - operator in default.

The board shall not grant a permit for new mining operations to an operator who is found to be in violation of this article at the time of application.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-121. Entry upon lands for inspection - reporting certain conditions.

The board, the office, or their authorized representatives may enter upon the lands of an operator at any reasonable time for inspection purposes to determine if the requirements of this article have been or are being met.

Any person engaged in any mining operation shall notify the office of any failure or imminent failure, as soon as reasonably practicable after such person has knowledge of such condition or of any impoundment, embankment, or slope that poses a reasonable potential for danger to any persons or property.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-122. Fees, civil penalties, and forfeitures - deposit.

All fees and assessments collected pursuant to this article and five percent of the proceeds of any financial warranty forfeited pursuant to section 34-32.5-123 for administrative costs associated with reclaiming sites for which the financial warranty has been revoked shall be deposited in the mined land reclamation fund, created in section 34-32-127. All civil penalties collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the general fund. Ninety-five percent of the proceeds of all financial warranties forfeited under section 34-32.5-118 shall be deposited in a special account in the general fund established by the board for the purpose of reclaiming lands that were required to be reclaimed under permits upon which such financial warranties had been forfeited.

An applicant that desires to use the self-insurance provisions in section 34-32.5-117 (3)(f)(IV) to (3)(f)(VII) or (8) shall pay an annual fee to the office sufficient to defray the actual cost to the office of establishing and reviewing the financial warranty of such applicant. Such funds are hereby annually made available to the office, which shall utilize outside financial and legal services for this purpose.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-123. Operating without a permit - penalty.

If an operator or person conducting exploration fails to obtain a valid permit or file a notice of intent pursuant to this article, the board or the office may issue an immediate cease-and-desist order. Concurrently with the issuance of such an order, the board or the office may seek a restraining order or injunction pursuant to section 34-32.5-124.

An operator who operates without a permit shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars per day nor more than five thousand dollars per day for each day the land has been affected, not to exceed three hundred sixty-five days. An operator who mines substantial acreage beyond the approved permit boundary may be found to be operating without a permit.

A person who conducts exploration without filing a notice of intent shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars per day nor more than two hundred dollars per day for each day the land has been affected. Such penalties shall be assessed for not less than one day and not more than sixty days.

In addition to the civil penalties imposed in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the board shall also assess a civil penalty in an amount not less than the amount necessary to cover costs incurred by the division in investigating the alleged violation.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-124. Failure to comply with conditions of order, permit, or regulation.

Whenever the board or the office has reason to believe that a violation of an order, permit, notice of intent, or regulation issued under this article has occurred, written notice of the alleged violation shall be given to the operator or person conducting the exploration. Such notice shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the alleged violator or the alleged violator's agent for service of process. The notice shall state the provision alleged to have been violated and the facts alleged to constitute such violation and may include the nature of any corrective action proposed to be required.

If the board determines that any provision of this article or any notice, permit, or regulation issued or promulgated pursuant to this article has been violated, it may issue a cease-and-desist order. Such order shall set forth the provisions alleged to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, and the time by which the acts or practices complained of must be terminated. Such order may include the nature of any corrective action proposed to be required and shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the alleged violator or the violator's agent for service of process.

If an operator fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued by the board, the board or the office may request the attorney general to bring suit for a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction to prevent any further or continued violation of such order. Suits under this section shall be brought in the district court where the alleged violation occurs. If the board or the office determines that the situation is an emergency, the emergency shall be given precedence over all other matters pending in such court.

The board or the office may require the alleged violator to appear before the board no sooner than thirty days after the issuance of such cease-and-desist order; except that an earlier date for hearing may be requested by the alleged violator.

If a hearing is held pursuant to this section, it shall be open to the public and conducted in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The board shall permit all parties to respond to the notice served, present evidence and arguments on all issues, and conduct the cross-examination necessary for a full disclosure of the facts.

Upon a determination, after a hearing, that a violation of a permit provision has occurred, the board may suspend, modify, or revoke such permit.

If the board suspends or revokes the permit of an operator, such operator may continue mining operations only for the purpose of bringing such operations into satisfactory compliance with the provisions of such operator's permit. Once such operations are completed to the satisfaction of the board, the board shall reinstate such permit.

A person who violates any provision of a permit issued under this article shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars per day nor more than one thousand dollars per day for each day during which such violation occurs.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-125. Mined land reclamation fund - fees.

Fees for fiscal year 2007-08 and for each subsequent year of operation shall be collected by the office for operations according to the following schedule:

Applications pursuant to:

Section

34-32.5-110

(2) .................... $ 1,258

Section

34-32.5-110

(2) relating to permit amendments .................... $ 827

Section

34-32.5-111 (1)(a)

.................... $ 898

Section

34-32.5-111 (1)(b)

.................... $ 400

Section

34-32.5-112

, except for applications relating to the mining operations specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) .................... $ 2,696

Section

34-32.5-112

relating to quarries .................... $ 3,342

Section

34-32.5-112 (8)

relating to reclamation permit amendments .................... $ 2,229

Sections 34-32.5-110 to

34-32.5-112

relating to revisions to permits other than amendments .................... $ 216

Section

34-32.5-103

(11) relating to temporary cessations of operations .................... $ 144

Section

34-32.5-113

.................... $ 108

Section

34-32.5-119

.................... $ 144

Annual fees for fiscal year 2007-08 and for each subsequent year for operations pursuant to:

Section

34-32.5-110 (2)

.................... $ 323

Section

34-32.5-112

.................... $ 791

Section

34-32.5-111 (1)(a)

.................... $ 504

Section

34-32.5-111 (1)(b)

.................... $ 200

Section

34-32.5-113

.................... $ 86

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1165, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.)

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in subsection (1) of this section, the board by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the board by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) added, p. 1341, § 62, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1165, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 960, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(III) and (1)(b)(III) amended, (SB 18-184), ch. 132, p. 858, § 2, effective August 8.